Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.52.030

Burglary in the second degree.

(1) A person is guilty of burglary in the second degree if, with intent to commit a crime against a person or property therein, he or she enters or remains unlawfully in a building other than a vehicle or a dwelling.

(2) Burglary in the second degree is a class B felony.

[ 2011 c 336 s 370; 1989 2nd ex.s. c 1 s 2; 1989 c 412 s 2; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 38 s 7; 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.52.030.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1989 2nd ex.s. c 1: See note following RCW 9A.52.025.

Effective date—Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 38: See notes following RCW 9A.08.020.